Utah statutes.
26-23a-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Health care provider" means any person, firm, corporation, or
association which furnishes treatment or care to persons who have suffered
bodily injury, and includes hospitals, clinics, podiatrists, dentists and
dental hygienists, nurses, nurse practitioners, physicians and physicians'
assistants, osteopathic physicians, naturopathic practitioners, chiropractors,
acupuncturists, paramedics, and emergency medical technicians.
(2)  "Injury" does not include any psychological or physical condition brought
about solely through the voluntary administration of prescribed controlled
substances.
(3)  "Law enforcement agency" means the municipal or county law enforcement
agency:
(a)  having jurisdiction over the location where the injury occurred; or
(b)  if the reporting health care provider is unable to identify or contact
the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the injury, "law enforcement
agency" means the agency nearest to the location of the reporting health care
provider.
(4)  "Report to a law enforcement agency" means to report, by telephone or
other spoken communication, the facts known regarding an injury subject to
reporting under Section 26-23a-2 to the dispatch desk or other staff person
designated by the law enforcement agency to receive reports from the public.
